North Dakota, session 69, SB2152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 11-18-02.2 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
6. This section does not apply to deeds transferring title to the following types of property, or to
deeds relating to the following transactions:
a. Property owned or used by public utilities.
b. Property classified as personal property.
c. A sale when the grantor and the grantee are of the same family or corporate affiliate, if
known.
d. A sale that resulted as a settlement of an estate.
e. All forced sales, mortgage foreclosures, and tax sales.
f. All sales to or from religious, charitable, or nonprofit organizations.
g. All sales when there is an indicated change of use by the new owners.
h. All transfer of ownership of property for which is given a quitclaim deed.
i. Sales of property not assessable by law.
j. Agricultural lands of less than eighty acres [32.37 hectares].

S. B. NO. 2152 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2152.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 16 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State